Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; COMMUNITY ENERGY TRANSITION GRANTS.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the community energy transition grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.55. This appropriation is onetime and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end